Georgia, session 2025_26, SB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as "Andee's Law."
SECTION 2.
Code Section 31-10-14 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to issuance of a
new birth certificate following adoption and legitimation or paternity determination, is
amended by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(h)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section or any other provision
of law, any person who is 18 years of age or older who was born in this state and for
S. B. 100
- 1 -

LC 44 2993
whom a new birth certificate was established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a)
of this Code section may request and receive a copy of his or her original birth certificate
by complying with the provisions of this subsection. The state registrar shall require a
person seeking an original birth certificate to pay the fee for a birth certificate as
prescribed pursuant to Code Section 31-10-27. The copy of the original birth certificate
shall be in a form that clearly indicates it is not a certified copy and that it may not be
used for legal purposes.
(2) If the person who was born in this state and for whom a new birth certificate was
established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section is deceased,
any parent, sibling, or descendant of that person may receive a copy of the decedent's
original birth certificate pursuant to the procedures contained in this subsection.
(3) This subsection shall apply to all applications for original birth certificates for
adopted persons presented to the state registrar on or after July 1, 2025."
SECTION 3.
The Official Code of Georgia Annotated is amended by replacing "certificate of birth" and
"certificates of birth" wherever either such term occurs with "birth certificate" and "birth
certificates", respectively, in:
(1) Code Section 19-3-36, relating to proof of age of applicants for marriage license;
(2) Code Section 19-7-46.1, relating to effect of father's name or social security number
on records as evidence of paternity;
(3) Code Section 31-10-1, relating to definitions relative to vital records, in
paragraph (14);
(4) Code Section 31-10-6, relating to local registrars, local custodians, special abstracting
agents, and deputies;
(5) Code Section 31-10-8, relating to certification to county treasurers of birth and death
certificates and spontaneous fetal death reports;
S. B. 100
- 2 -

LC 44 2993
(6) Code Section 31-10-9, relating to registration of births;
(7) Code Section 31-10-9.1, relating to social security account information of parents;
(8) Code Section 31-10-10, relating to registration of live born infants of unknown
parentage;
(9) Code Section 31-10-11, relating to registration of delayed certificate of birth;
(10) Code Section 31-10-12, relating to judicial procedure to establish facts of birth;
(11) Code Section 31-10-13, relating to certificates of adoption;
(12) Code Section 31-10-14, relating to issuance of new certificate of birth following
adoption and legitimation or paternity determination;
(13) Code Section 31-10-23, relating to amendment of certificates or reports;
(14) Code Section 31-10-26, relating to issuance of certified copies of vital records,
voluntary acknowledgments of paternity, and voluntary acknowledgments of
legitimation;
(15) Code Section 31-10-28, relating to institutions to keep vital records;
(16) Code Section 31-10-31, relating to penalties; and
(17) Code Section 31-10-33, relating to procedure for stillbirth.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 100
- 3 -